District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.07

Criteria for indicators of misuse; Director’s authority to disclose information; intervention.

(a)

The Director may establish through rulemaking:

(1)

Criteria for indicators of misuse; and

(2)

A method for analysis of data collected by the Program using the criteria for indicators of misuse.

(b)

Upon the development of the criteria and data analysis, the Director may, in addition to the discretionary disclosure of information pursuant to this chapter, disclose information using the criteria that indicates potential misuse by recipients of covered substances to their specific prescribers for the purpose of intervention to prevent such misuse.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 8, 61 DCR 7

History